Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 5
ACTIONS BY OR AGAINST HOME RULE COUNTIES

30-35-501. Review without bond.

In all actions, suits, and proceedings in any court in this state in which a county of this state shall be a party, such county may take an appeal or writ of certiorari, as provided by law or rule of court, without giving bond.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1475, § 1, effective June 8.